Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-912
Department; develop client feedback; collect statistical data.

The department shall develop a means of client feedback and collect statistical data to assist it in evaluating program effectiveness.

Laws 1978, LB 623, § 12.